Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1309
Arbitration board; appointed; when; manner.

The arbitration board shall be appointed within ninety days after the receipt of the notice of the dispute. Each party shall notify the other in writing of the name and address of the arbitrator selected by it within sixty days after receipt of the notice of the dispute. The two arbitrators selected by the parties shall notify the parties in writing of the name and address of the third arbitrator selected by them.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 9.